Massachusetts, session 194th, H1794.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 14 of chapter 269 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 15, at the beginning of paragraph (1), the
following:— to behead persons at a place or location; or
SECTION 2. Said section 14 of said chapter 269 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby further amended by inserting in line 30, after the word “threat”, the following:, or
knowingly communicates a false report of an active shooting at a school,
of 1